Idaho, session 2026, S1296.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-7008, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-7008. CRIMINAL TRESPASS -- DEFINITIONS AND ACTS CONSTITUT-
ING. (1) Definitions. As used in this section:
(a) "Crops" means field crops including, but not limited to, grains,
feed crops, legumes, fruits and vegetables.
(b) "Cultivated land" means:
(i) Land whose soil is loosened or broken up for the raising of
crops;
(ii) Land used for the raising of crops; or
(iii) Pasturage that is artificially irrigated.
(c) "Damage" means any injury or damage to real or personal property
and includes, but is not limited to, any of the following actions, when
conducted without lawful authority, the consent of the landowner or his
agent, or a valid license:
(i) Cutting down or carrying off any wood, underbrush, tree or
timber, or girdling or otherwise injuring any tree or timber on the
land of another;
(ii) Severing from the property of another anything attached
thereto, or the produce thereof;
(iii) Digging, taking or carrying away any earth, soil or stone
from the property of another;
(iv) Tearing down or otherwise damaging any fence on the land of
another person, or opening any gate, bar or fence of another person
and leaving it open, or using the corral or corrals of another per-
son;
(v) Dumping trash or covering up in any manner the property of
another person;
(vi) The unprovoked, intentional killing or injuring of a domes-
tic animal of another on his property;
(vii) Removing, mutilating, damaging or destroying any "no tres-
passing" signs or markers of similar meaning;
(viii) Going through or driving a motor vehicle, as defined in sec-
tions 49-114 and 49-123, Idaho Code, into, upon, over or through
any cultivated lands; or
(ix) Injuring livestock.


(d) "Enter" or "enters" means going upon or over real property either
in person or by causing any object, substance or force to go upon or over
real property.
(e) "Navigable streams" shall have the meaning set forth in section
36-1601, Idaho Code.
(f) "Permission" means written authorization from the owner or his
agent to enter upon private land, which shall include the signature of
the owner or his agent, the name of the person being given permission,
the appropriate dates that the permission is valid and a general de-
scription of the property; or another form of permission or invitation
recognized by law.
(g) "Remains" means to fail to depart from the real property of another
immediately when notified to do so by the owner or his agent.
(2) Acts constituting criminal trespass.
(a) A person commits criminal trespass and is guilty of a misdemeanor,
except as provided in subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section, when he
enters or remains on the real property of another without permission,
knowing or with reason to know that his presence is not permitted. A
person has reason to know his presence is not permitted when, except un-
der a landlord-tenant relationship, he fails to depart immediately from
the real property of another after being notified by the owner or his
agent to do so, or he returns without permission or invitation within
one (1) year, unless a longer period of time is designated by the owner
or his agent. In addition, a person has reason to know that his pres-
ence is not permitted on real property that meets any of the following
descriptions:
(i) The property is reasonably associated with a residence or
place of business;
(ii) The property is cultivated;
(iii) The property is fenced or otherwise enclosed in a manner
that a reasonable person would recognize as delineating a private
property boundary. Provided, however, if the property adjoins
or is contained within public lands, the fence line adjacent to
public land is posted with conspicuous "no trespassing" signs or
bright orange or fluorescent paint at the corners of the fence
adjoining public land and at all navigable streams, roads, gates
and rights-of-way entering the private land from the public land,
and is posted in a manner that a reasonable person would be put on
notice that it is private land; or
(iv) The property is unfenced and uncultivated but is posted with
conspicuous "no trespassing" signs or bright orange or fluores-
cent paint at all property corners and boundaries where the prop-
erty intersects navigable streams, roads, gates and rights-of-way
entering the land, and is posted in a manner that a reasonable per-
son would be put on notice that it is private land.
(b) A person commits criminal trespass and is guilty of a misdemeanor
when he enters or remains on the premises of a church or house of worship
without permission, knowing or with reason to know that his presence is
not permitted and with the intent to intimidate or harass or to disrupt a
church service or assemblage of people meeting for religious worship.


(b) (c) Every person who commits a criminal trespass as provided by this
section and who causes damage to real or personal property in excess of
one thousand dollars ($1,000) while trespassing is guilty of criminal
trespass with damage and is guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided
in subsection (3)(b)(iii) of this section.
(3) Penalties.
(a) Penalties for criminal trespass.
(i) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a viola-
tion of subsection (2)(a) of this section for the first time:
1. If no damage of any kind was committed during the trespass
and the person accused does not remain if ordered to depart
by the owner of the real property or his agent, then the per-
son shall be guilty of an infraction and fined in the amount
of three hundred dollars ($300); or
2. Except as provided in subparagraph (i)1. of this para-
graph, the person may be sentenced to jail for a period of no
more than six (6) months and shall be fined in an amount no
less than five hundred dollars ($500) and no more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(ii) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a viola-
tion of subsection (2)(b) of this section for the first time shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and may be sentenced to jail for a period
of no more than six (6) months and shall be fined in an amount no
less than five hundred dollars ($500) and no more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
(ii) (iii) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a
violation of subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section for a second
time within five (5) years:
1. May be sentenced to jail for a period of no more than six
(6) months;
2. Shall be fined in an amount no less than one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500) and no more than three thousand
dollars ($3,000); and
3. If the trespass can be reasonably construed to have been
committed in a manner described in section 36-1603(a), Idaho
Code, shall have any license issued pursuant to chapter 3,
title 36, Idaho Code, suspended for a period of one (1) year.
(iii) (iv) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of
a violation of subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section, who pre-
viously has been found guilty of or has pled guilty to two (2) or
more violations of the provisions of subsection (2) of this sec-
tion within ten (10) years, notwithstanding the form of the judg-
ments or withheld judgments:
1. May be sentenced to jail for a period no more than one (1)
year;
2. Shall be fined an amount no less than five thousand
dollars ($5,000) and no more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000); and
3. If the trespass can be reasonably construed to have been
committed in a manner described in section 36-1603(a), Idaho


Code, shall have any license issued pursuant to chapter 3,
title 36, Idaho Code, suspended for a period of no more than
five (5) years.
(b) Penalties for criminal trespass with damage.
(i) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a viola-
tion of subsection (2)(b)(c) of this section for the first time:
1. May be sentenced to jail for a period of no more than six
(6) months; and
2. Shall be fined in an amount no less than one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500) and no more than five thousand dol-
lars ($5,000).
(ii) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a vio-
lation of subsection (2)(b)(c) of this section for a second time
within five (5) years:
1. May be sentenced to jail for a period of no more than six
(6) months;
2. Shall be fined in an amount no less than five thou-
sand dollars ($5,000) and no more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000); and
3. If the trespass can be reasonably construed to have been
committed in a manner described in section 36-1603(a), Idaho
Code, shall have any license issued pursuant to chapter 3,
title 36, Idaho Code, suspended for a period of one (1) year.
(iii) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a vio-
lation of subsection (2)(b)(c) of this section, who previously has
been found guilty of or has pled guilty to two (2) or more viola-
tions of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section within
ten (10) years, notwithstanding the form of the judgments or with-
held judgments, is guilty of a felony and:
1. Shall be sentenced to the custody of the state board of
correction for a period of no less than one (1) year and no
more than five (5) years;
2. Shall be fined in an amount no less than fifteen thou-
sand dollars ($15,000) and no more than fifty thousand dol-
lars ($50,000); and
3. If the trespass can be reasonably construed to have been
committed in a manner described in section 36-1603(a), Idaho
Code, shall have any license issued pursuant to chapter 3,
title 36, Idaho Code, suspended for a period of no less than
five (5) years.
(c) In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, a court shall,
for any violation of subsection (2) of this section, order restitution
in accordance with section 19-5304, Idaho Code.
(4) Posting of navigable streams shall not prohibit access to navigable
streams below the high-water mark pursuant to section 36-1601, Idaho Code.
(5) Subject to any rights or authorities described in subsection (6) of
this section, a landowner or his agent may revoke permission granted under
this section to another to enter or remain upon his property at any time, for
any reason, orally, in writing, or by any other form of notice reasonably ap-
parent to the permitted person or persons.


(6) A person shall not be guilty of trespass under this section for en-
tering or remaining upon real property if the person entered or remained on
the property pursuant to any of the following rights or authorities:
(a) An established right of entry or occupancy of the real property in
question, including, but not limited to:
(i) An invitation, whether express or implied, to enter or remain
on real property including, but not limited to, the right to enter
property that is, at the time, open to the public, if the person is
in compliance with lawful conditions imposed on access;
(ii) A license to enter or remain on real property; or
(iii) A lease, easement, contract, privilege or other legal right
to enter, remain upon, possess or use the real property;
(b) A lawful authority to enter onto or remain upon the real property in
question, including, but not limited to:
(i) Any law enforcement officer during the course and scope of
fulfilling his lawful duties;
(ii) Any paramedic, firefighter or other emergency personnel dur-
ing the course and scope of fulfilling his lawful duties; or
(iii) Any licensed professional otherwise authorized to enter or
remain on the real property during the course and scope of fulfill-
ing his lawful duties; or
(c) Any other person with a legally prescribed right to enter or remain
upon the real property in question.
(7) Examples of the exclusions in subsection (6) of this section in-
clude, but are not limited to: a customer entering and remaining in a store
during business hours who has not been asked to depart by the property owner
or his agent; a person knocking on a front door of a property that is not
posted; a meter reader during the scope and course of his employment; a
postal employee delivering mail or packages; power company personnel fixing
downed power lines; a bail bondsman arresting a person who is in violation of
a bail contract; a tenant pursuant to a valid lease; and the owner or operator
of any right-of-way or easement for any ditch, canal or other conduit, acting
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 11 or chapter 12, title 42, Idaho Code.
(8) The exclusions set forth in this section shall not relieve any per-
son of civil or criminal liability pursuant to other applicable law for caus-
ing damage while entering or remaining on the property in question.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.